Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

27-50-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 50, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health" refers to an individual's mental and emotional well-being and actions that affect an individual's overall wellness. Behavioral health issues and disorders include substance use disorders, mental health disorders, serious psychological distress, serious mental disturbance, and suicide and range from unhealthy stress or subclinical conditions to diagnosable and treatable diseases. "Behavioral health" also describes service systems that encompass promotion of emotional health and prevention and treatment services for mental health disorders and substance use disorders.

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

"Behavioral health disorder" means an alcohol use disorder, a mental health disorder, or a substance use disorder.

"Behavioral health entity" means a facility or provider organization engaged in providing community-based health services, which may include services for a behavioral health disorder, but does not include residential child care facilities, as defined in section 26-6-903 (29), detention and commitment facilities operated by the division of youth services within the department of human services, or services provided by a licensed or certified mental health-care provider under the provider's individual professional practice act on the provider's own premises.

"Behavioral health program" means the specific services and administration of those services by a behavioral health provider.

"Behavioral health provider" means a recovery community organization as defined in section 27-80-126, a recovery support services organization as defined in section 27-60-108, or a licensed organization or professional providing diagnostic, therapeutic, or psychological services for behavioral health conditions. Behavioral health providers include a residential child care facility, as defined in section 26-6-903 (29), and a federally qualified health center.

"Behavioral health safety net provider" means any and all behavioral health safety net providers, including comprehensive community behavioral health providers and essential behavioral health safety net providers. A community mental health center pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 300x-2(c) and that is licensed as a behavioral health entity may apply to be approved as a comprehensive community behavioral health provider, an essential behavioral health safety net provider, or both.

"Behavioral health safety net services" means the specific behavioral health services for children, youth, and adults that must be provided statewide pursuant to part 3 of this article 50.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration appointed pursuant to section 27-50-103.

"Community-based" means outside of a hospital, psychiatric hospital, detention and commitment facility operated by the division of youth services within the department of human services, or nursing home.

"Comprehensive community behavioral health provider" means a licensed behavioral health entity approved by the behavioral health administration to provide the following behavioral health safety net services, either directly or through formal agreements with behavioral health providers in the community or region:

Emergency and crisis behavioral health services;

Mental health and substance use outpatient services;

Behavioral health high-intensity outpatient services;

Care management;

Outreach, education, and engagement services;

Mental health and substance use recovery supports;

Care coordination;

Outpatient competency restoration; and

Screening, assessment, and diagnosis, including risk assessment, crisis planning, and monitoring to key health indicators.

"Department" means the department of human services created pursuant to section 26-1-105.

"Essential behavioral health safety net provider" means a licensed behavioral health entity or behavioral health provider approved by the behavioral health administration to provide at least one of the behavioral health safety net services described in subsection (11) of this section.

"Health information organization network" has the same meaning as defined in section 25-3.5-103 (8.5).

"Mental health disorder" means one or more substantial disorders of the cognitive, volitional, or emotional processes that grossly impairs judgment or capacity to recognize reality or to control behavior.

"Primary prevention" means activities and strategies used to intervene before health effects occur through measures that prevent the onset of addiction, delay initial use of alcohol, marijuana, and tobacco, deter the use of illegal drugs, and promote health and wellness.

"Priority populations" means people who are:

Uninsured, underinsured, medicaid-eligible, publicly insured, or whose income is below thresholds established by the BHA; and

Presenting with acute or chronic behavioral health needs, including but not limited to individuals who have been determined incompetent to stand trial, adults with serious mental illness, and children and youth with serious emotional disturbance.

The BHA shall further identify underserved populations meeting the criteria of subsection (17)(a) of this section for specific prioritization on a regional or statewide basis based on health equity data, including but not limited to people experiencing or at risk of homelessness; children and youth at risk of out-of-home placement and their parents; people involved with the criminal or juvenile justice system; people of color; American Indians; Alaska natives; veterans; people who are pregnant; people who are lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or queer or questioning; and individuals with disabilities as defined by the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended. The BHA shall also consider input directly from behavioral health providers that are culturally and linguistically representative of the populations they serve. The BHA shall consider recommendations from the behavioral health administrative services organizations, the advisory council, and regional subcommittees in identifying subpopulations.

"State agency" means any state department, state office, or state division in Colorado that administers a behavioral health program.

"State agency" does not include the judicial branch of state government.

"State board" means the state board of human services created pursuant to section 26-1-107.

"Substance use disorder" means a chronic relapsing brain disease, characterized by recurrent use of alcohol, drugs, or both, causing clinically significant impairment, including health problems, disability, and failure to meet major responsibilities at work, school, or home.

"Substance use disorder program" means a program for the detoxification, withdrawal, maintenance, or treatment of a person with a substance use disorder.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1443, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-102. Behavioral health administration - creation - coordination.

There is established in the department of human services the behavioral health administration. Nothing in this subsection (1) precludes any future legislative action taken pursuant to section 27-60-203 (5) regarding the future location of the BHA.

The BHA is charged with creating a coordinated, cohesive, and effective behavioral health system in Colorado. Any state agency that administers a behavioral health program shall collaborate with the BHA to achieve the goals and objectives established by the BHA. In order to ensure regular engagement with other state agencies and to maintain alignment in state programs, resource allocation, priorities, and strategic planning, the commissioner shall chair a regular meeting of the executive directors of state agencies.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1446, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-103. Behavioral health commissioner - appointment - powers, duties, and functions - subdivisions of the BHA.

The governor shall appoint the commissioner, who is the head of the BHA. The commissioner has the full authority, with the governor, to lead and develop the state's vision and strategy for behavioral health for children, youth, and adults.

The commissioner shall:

Be well-versed in behavioral health;

Be registered to vote in Colorado during the commissioner's term of service; and

Have no pecuniary interest, directly or indirectly, in any behavioral health company or agency other than as a behavioral health services recipient.

The commissioner shall ensure that:

Behavioral health programs delivered by state agencies and commercial payers are comprehensive, evidence-based, affordable, high quality, equity-focused, and easily accessible for all Coloradans;

Behavioral health strategies, program priorities, and funding allocations for behavioral health align with the vision set forth by the BHA and the governor; and

There is a streamlined approach to using public money to improve behavioral health across the continuum of care from prevention to recovery.

The commissioner shall engage with the legislative and judicial branches of government to achieve the state's vision for behavioral health.

The commissioner may establish subdivisions, sections, or units necessary for the proper discharge of the powers, duties, and functions of the BHA.

The commissioner shall establish an infrastructure to oversee and be accountable for policy, strategy, and services for children and youth.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1447, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-104. Powers and duties of the commissioner - rules.

The commissioner may adopt "commissioner rules" for behavioral health programs administered and services provided by the BHA as listed in section 27-50-105 (1). The rules must be promulgated in accordance with section 24-4-103.

Any rules adopted by the executive director of the department of human services prior to July 1, 2022, to implement the behavioral health programs to be administered and services to be provided by the BHA listed in section 27-50-105 (1), and whose content meets the definition of "executive director rules" pursuant to section 26-1-108, are effective until revised, amended, or repealed by the commissioner.

"Commissioner rules" are solely within the province of the commissioner, except those determinations precluded by authority granted to the state board of human services. "Commissioner rules" must include:

Matters of internal administration in the BHA, including organization, staffing, records, reports, systems, and procedures;

Fiscal and personnel administration for the BHA; and

Accounting and fiscal reporting rules for disbursement of federal funds, contingency funds, and proration of available appropriations.

Whenever a statutory grant of rule-making authority in this title 27 refers to the BHA, it means the behavioral health administration acting through either the state board of human services, the commissioner, or both. When exercising rule-making authority pursuant to this title 27, the BHA shall promulgate rules consistent with the powers and the distinction between "board rules" as set forth in section 26-1-107 and "commissioner rules" as set forth in this section.

The rules promulgated by the commissioner pertaining to this title 27 are binding upon the behavioral health providers, vendors, and agents of the BHA. At any public hearing relating to a proposed rule, interested persons have the right to present the person's data, views, or arguments orally. Proposed rules of the commissioner are subject to section 24-4-103.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1447, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-105. Administration of behavioral health programs - state plan - sole mental health authority.

The BHA shall administer and provide the following behavioral health programs and services:

The regulation of recovery residences pursuant to section 25-1.5-108.5;

The behavioral health crisis response system created pursuant to section 27-60-103;

The behavioral health capacity tracking system created pursuant to section 27-60-104.5;

The jail-based behavioral health services program created pursuant to section 27-60-106;

Criminal justice diversion programs pursuant to section 27-60-106.5;

Peer support professionals and recovery support services organizations pursuant to section 27-60-108;

The temporary youth mental health services program created pursuant to section 27-60-109;

Behavioral health-care services for rural and agricultural communities pursuant to section 27-60-110;

The county-based behavioral health grant program created pursuant to section 27-60-111;

The behavioral health-care workforce development program created pursuant to section 27-60-112;

The statewide care coordination infrastructure pursuant to section 27-60-204;

High-fidelity wraparound services for children and youth pursuant to article 62 of this title 27;

The behavioral health safety net system pursuant to article 63 of this title 27;

The 988 crisis hotline enterprise created pursuant to section 27-64-103;

The care and treatment of persons with mental health disorders pursuant to article 65 of this title 27;

The community mental health services purchase program pursuant to section 27-66-104;

The standards for approval in the community mental health services purchase program pursuant to section 27-66-105;

Trauma-informed care standards of approval pursuant to section 27-66-110;

The community transition specialist program created pursuant to article 66.5 of this title 27;

The "Children and Youth Mental Health Treatment Act", article 67 of this title 27;

Medication consistency for individuals with behavioral or mental health disorders in the criminal and juvenile justice systems pursuant to article 70 of this title 27;

Grants for public programs pursuant to section 27-80-103;

The purchase of prevention and treatment services pursuant to section 27-80-106;

The designation of managed service organizations pursuant to section 27-80-107;

The "Increasing Access to Effective Substance Use Disorder Services Act" pursuant to section 27-80-107.5;

The coordination of state and federal funds and programs pursuant to section 27-80-109;

Addiction counselor training requirements pursuant to section 27-80-111;

The treatment program for high-risk pregnant women created pursuant to section 27-80-112;

The rural alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment program created pursuant to section 27-80-117;

The care navigation program pursuant to section 27-80-119;

The building substance use disorder treatment capacity in underserved communities grant program created pursuant to section 27-80-120;

The recovery residence certifying body pursuant to section 27-80-122;

The high-risk families cash fund created pursuant to section 27-80-123;

Temporary financial housing assistance for individuals with substance use disorders pursuant to section 27-80-125;

The recovery support services grant program created pursuant to section 27-80-126;

Controlled substances licensing pursuant to part 2 of article 80 of this title 27;

The comprehensive and coordinated program for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs pursuant to section 27-81-105;

The standards for public and private treatment facilities that receive public funds pursuant to section 27-81-106;

Acceptance for substance use disorder treatment pursuant to section 27-81-108;

Voluntary treatment of persons with substance use disorders pursuant to section 27-81-109;

Voluntary treatment for persons intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances pursuant to section 27-81-110;

The emergency commitment of persons pursuant to section 27-81-111;

The involuntary commitment of a person with a substance use disorder pursuant to section 27-81-112;

Emergency service patrols pursuant to section 27-81-115;

Payment for treatment pursuant to section 27-81-116;

The maternal and child health pilot program pursuant to part 2 of article 82 of this title 27;

Human services referral services pursuant to section 29-11-203;

DUI treatment programs pursuant to article 2 of title 42;

Alcohol and drug driving safety education or treatment pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3;

Gambling addiction account funding pursuant to section 44-30-1301; and

Sports betting funding pursuant to section 44-30-1509.

The BHA shall formulate a comprehensive state plan for substance use disorder treatment and mental health services programs for the purpose of administering the federal block grant funds described in subsection (2)(c) of this section. The BHA shall submit the state plan to the governor and, upon the governor's approval, submit the state plan to the appropriate United States agency for review and approval.

The BHA is designated as the sole entity for the supervision of the administration of the state plan.

The BHA is designated the official mental health authority and is authorized to receive and administer:

Grants-in-aid from the federal government pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 246; and

Other grants from the federal government for the provision of mental health or integrated behavioral health services.

The BHA may provide consultation and conduct training programs at the state, regional, or local level to support the professional development of licensed or approved behavioral health providers. The BHA may reimburse providers for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in attending the training programs.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1448, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-106. Transfer of functions.

The powers, duties, and functions previously administered by the department of public health and environment concerning licensing behavioral health entities pursuant to article 27.6 of title 25 shall transfer to the BHA over a period of two years, with all functions fully transferred to the BHA by July 1, 2024, as follows:

The department of public health and environment shall continue issuing and renewing behavioral health entity licenses until June 30, 2023, after which date the department of public health and environment shall not renew or confer any new behavioral health entity licenses. Behavioral health entities that are licensed by the department of public health and environment are subject to the rules and orders of the department of public health and environment until such rules and orders are revised, amended, repealed, or nullified. The department of public health and environment shall continue compliance monitoring and enforcement activities until all licenses the department of public health and environment has conferred are expired, revoked, or surrendered, but not after June 30, 2024.

On July 1, 2023, the department of public health and environment shall transfer any applications pending as of that date to the BHA for disposition.

On July 1, 2023, the BHA shall begin licensing functions for all new or renewal behavioral health entity licenses. Behavioral health entities that are licensed by the BHA are subject to the rules and orders of the state board of human services, including those transferred and not repealed.

Rules concerning behavioral health entities promulgated by the state board of human services pursuant to this section only apply to those behavioral health entities that are licensed by the BHA.

No later than July 1, 2024, all behavioral health entities must be licensed by, and in compliance with the rules and orders of, the state board of human services.

The department of public health and environment and the BHA shall coordinate to ensure that the oversight and licensing of behavioral health entities transfers smoothly between the department of public health and environment and the BHA without any delays in oversight or related duties.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1452, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-107. State board of human services - rules.

The state board of human services created pursuant to section 26-1-107 is the type 1 board for promulgating, revising, and repealing BHA rules.

Any rules promulgated by the state board of human services to implement the provisions of this article 50 or any other behavioral health program administered or service provided by the department of human services prior to July 1, 2022, are effective until revised, amended, or repealed by the state board of human services.

The state board of human services may promulgate rules that include, but are not limited to:

Any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of a behavioral health program administered by the BHA as listed in section 27-50-105, including record keeping, data collection, and health information organization network connection;

Conditions that may be imposed on a behavioral health entity for licensure;

Conditions that may be imposed on a behavioral health program for the program to receive public funds as part of the behavioral health safety net system created pursuant to part 3 of this article 50;

Requirements for public and private agencies, organizations, and institutions that the BHA may purchase services from pursuant to section 27-80-106 (1), which requirements must include prohibiting the purchase of services from agencies, organizations, and institutions that deny or prohibit access to medical services or substance use disorder treatment and services to a person who is participating in prescribed medication-assisted treatment, as defined in section 23-21-803, for a substance use disorder; and

Standards that addiction counselors must meet to participate in behavioral health programs or to provide purchased services, and requirements necessary for addiction counselors to be certified by the state board of addiction counselor examiners, pursuant to part 8 of article 245 of title 12.

The rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (3)(e)(I) of this section must include education requirements for certified addiction technicians, certified addiction specialists, and licensed addiction counselors.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1453, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-108. Systemwide behavioral health grievance system.

On or before July 1, 2024, the BHA shall create and implement a process for collecting, analyzing, and addressing behavioral health system grievances across payers, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care entities, and providers at a systemic level that leverages and does not duplicate existing grievance resolution programs. The BHA shall analyze grievances to identify and address service delivery gaps and to inform statewide behavioral health system policy.

The BHA shall, at a minimum, track grievances by behavioral health provider, topic, region, managed care entity, behavioral health administrative services organizations, payer source, service, or diagnosis and aggregate demographic data. In order to promote transparency, accountability, and system collaboration, the BHA shall publish, at least annually, aggregated and anonymized data on grievances on a public-facing website.

The BHA shall implement a plan to streamline grievance resolution programs, promote transparency, improve consumer experience, and promote clarity and transparency.

On or before July 1, 2024, the BHA shall solicit input from the behavioral health administration advisory council created pursuant to section 27-50-701, the sub-committees created pursuant to section 27-50-703, and demographically diverse stakeholders to develop a process for addressing individual grievances when traditional grievance programs fail.

The BHA may refer individual grievances to the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care, created pursuant to section 27-80-303, when an individual may require further intervention or support to resolve the grievance in accordance with the charge of the ombudsman.

On or before July 1, 2024, the BHA and state agencies shall execute formal data-sharing agreements addressing data sharing consistent with state and federal requirements, cooperation between the BHA and state agencies, and any other provisions necessary to implement this section. At a minimum, the BHA and the following entities shall execute such agreements:

The ombudsman for medicaid managed care, established in section 25.5-5-406.1;

The ombudsman for behavioral health access to care, designated pursuant to section 27-80-303; and

The child protection ombudsman, appointed pursuant to section 19-3.3-103. All data released by the ombudsman shall comply with section 19-3.3-103 (1)(a)(I)(B) and (3).

The BHA may promulgate rules as needed to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1453, § 1, effective July 1.